Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 4 Disclosure of Professional Services Fees

45-7-70.
Purpose of article.

It is in the best interests of a free society that citizens be fully informed as to the conduct of their government and that those who serve the public by performing services requiring special qualification, training, or knowledge and the exercise of discretion or judgment be known and identified. To ensure that the public may better evaluate the stewardship of elected and appointed officials in the use of public funds for the purchase of professional services from other than full-time employees, it is appropriate that disclosure be made of the use of professional personnel and of the fees and reimbursement paid for such services and incidental expenses.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 978, § 1.

45-7-71.
Professional services fees to be identified in financial records.

In the fiscal and financial records of any state agency which are submitted for audit to the state auditor, any fees for services or reimbursable expenses charged to any authority created, authorized, or otherwise provided for by state law or charged to any board, bureau, commission, committee, department, institution, office, retirement system, or any other agency of the state by any consultant, architect, or attorney at law shall be identified by type of fee or expense and the purpose for which paid, to whom paid, and the dates when such payment or payments of fees and expenses were made. Salaries paid and reimbursement of expenses made to professional persons employed on a full-time basis by the authorities or state agencies are not included within the reporting requirement set forth in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 978, § 2.

45-7-72.
Statements or reports to Attorney General and state auditor.

A copy of each statement or report, referred to in Code Section 45-7-71, of any authority or state agency in which a fee or expense paid to a consultant or member of a profession is identified and reported shall be provided to the Attorney General and the state auditor unless such statement or report is otherwise required by law to be provided to the Attorney General or the state auditor.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 978, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 851, § 1.

45-7-73.
State auditor to prescribe form and date for submission of reports.

Where necessary to accomplish the purposes of this article, the state auditor shall by rule or regulation prescribe the form in which the reports of professional services shall be made by the authority or state agency. The state auditor shall also establish dates for the submission of the reports required by this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 978, § 4.

45-7-74.
State auditor to provide report of fees to various state officials.

The state auditor shall annually provide to the Governor, to each house of the General Assembly, to the Attorney General, and to the Secretary of State a report in which the accumulated totals of payments of fees and expenses to members of professions are set forth, identifying:

The person or persons to whom such payments were made;

The professions of such person or persons;

The totals of such payments; and

The authority or state agency which has retained such professional person or persons.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 978, § 5.